src/esu.lexc
LEXICON NounInflection
! -------------------------------------------------|
!              Absolutive Case Endings             |
! -----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------|
!                singular possessed                |                     plural possessed                 |                       dual possessed                   |
! -----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------|-----------------|
-[N][Abs][SgUnpd]:0                  EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Abs][PlUnpd]:%%%:(e)t             EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Abs][DuUnpd]:%%%:(e)k               EncliticOrEnd; ! unpossessed   |
! -------------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------------------|-----------------|
-[N][Abs][3SgPoss][SgPosd]:%:(ng)a     EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Abs][3SgPoss][PlPosd]:%:(ng)i       EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Abs][3SgPoss][DuPosd]:%%%:(e)k        EncliticOrEnd; ! 3SG possessor |
-[N][Abs][3PlPoss][SgPosd]:%:(ng)at    EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Abs][3PlPoss][PlPosd]:%:(ng)it      EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Abs][3PlPoss][DuPosd]:%%%:(e)gket     EncliticOrEnd; ! 3PL possessor |
-[N][Abs][3DuPoss][SgPosd]:%:(ng)ak    EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Abs][3DuPoss][PlPosd]:–kek          EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Abs][3DuPoss][DuPosd]:%%%:(e)gkek     EncliticOrEnd; ! 3Du possessor |
! -------------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------------------|-----------------|
-[N][Abs][1SgPoss][SgPosd]:–k̲a         EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Abs][1SgPoss][PlPosd]:%%%:(e)nka    EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Abs][1SgPoss][DuPosd]:%%%:(e)gka      EncliticOrEnd; ! 1SG possessor |
-[N][Abs][1PlPoss][SgPosd]:–put        EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Abs][1PlPoss][PlPosd]:–put          EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Abs][1PlPoss][DuPosd]:%%%:(e)gput     EncliticOrEnd; ! 1PL possessor |
-[N][Abs][1PlPoss][SgPosd]:+p|.vut     EncliticOrEnd;
-[N][Abs][1DuPoss][SgPosd]:–puk        EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Abs][1DuPoss][PlPosd]:–puk          EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Abs][1DuPoss][DuPosd]:%%%:(e)gpuk     EncliticOrEnd; ! 1Du possessor |
-[N][Abs][1DuPoss][SgPosd]:+p|.vuk     EncliticOrEnd;
! -------------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------------------|-----------------|
-[N][Abs][2SgPoss][SgPosd]:%%%:(e)n    EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Abs][2SgPoss][PlPosd]:–ten          EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Abs][2SgPoss][DuPosd]:%%%:(e)gken     EncliticOrEnd; ! 2SG possessor |
-[N][Abs][2PlPoss][SgPosd]:–ci         EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Abs][2PlPoss][PlPosd]:–ci           EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Abs][2PlPoss][DuPosd]:%%%:(e)gci      EncliticOrEnd; ! 2Pl possessor |
-[N][Abs][2PlPoss][SgPosd]:+c|.si      EncliticOrEnd; 
-[N][Abs][2DuPoss][SgPosd]:–tek        EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Abs][2DuPoss][PlPosd]:–tek          EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Abs][2DuPoss][DuPosd]:%%%:(e)gtek     EncliticOrEnd; ! 2Du possessor |
-[N][Abs][2DuPoss][SgPosd]:+t|.sek     EncliticOrEnd;
! -------------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------------------|-----------------|
-[N][Abs][4SgPoss][SgPosd]:–ni         EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Abs][4SgPoss][PlPosd]:–ni           EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Abs][4SgPoss][DuPosd]:%%%:(e)gni      EncliticOrEnd; ! 4SG possessor |
-[N][Abs][4PlPoss][SgPosd]:–teng       EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Abs][4PlPoss][PlPosd]:–teng         EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Abs][4PlPoss][DuPosd]:%%%:(e)gteng    EncliticOrEnd; ! 4Pl possessor |
-[N][Abs][4PlPoss][SgPosd]:+t|.seng    EncliticOrEnd;
-[N][Abs][4DuPoss][SgPosd]:–tek        EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Abs][4DuPoss][PlPosd]:–tek          EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Abs][4DuPoss][DuPosd]:%%%:(e)gtek     EncliticOrEnd; ! 4Du possessor |
-[N][Abs][4DuPoss][SgPosd]:+t|.sek     EncliticOrEnd;
! -------------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------------------|-----------------|


! -------------------------------------------------|
!              Relative Case Endings               |
! ----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------|
!               singular possessed                 |                    plural possessed                |               dual possessed                |
! -----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------|-----------------|
-[N][Rel][SgUnpd]:%%%:(e)m           EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Rel][PlUnpd]:%%%:(e)t            EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Rel][DuUnpd]:%%%:(e)k                 EncliticOrEnd; ! unpossessed   |
! -------------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------------------|-----------------|
-[N][Rel][3SgPoss][SgPosd]:%:(ng)an    EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Rel][3SgPoss][PlPosd]:%:(ng)in    EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Rel][3SgPoss][DuPosd]:%%%:(e)gken       EncliticOrEnd; ! 3Sg possessor |
-[N][Rel][3PlPoss][SgPosd]:%:(ng)ata   EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Rel][3PlPoss][PlPosd]:%:(ng)ita   EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Rel][3PlPoss][DuPosd]:%%%:(e)gketa      EncliticOrEnd; ! 3Pl possessor |
-[N][Rel][3DuPoss][SgPosd]:%:(ng)agnek EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Rel][3DuPoss][PlPosd]:–kenka      EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Rel][3DuPoss][DuPosd]:%%%:(e)gkenka     EncliticOrEnd; ! 3Du possessor |
! -------------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------------------|-----------------|
-[N][Rel][1SgPoss][SgPosd]:–ma         EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Rel][1SgPoss][PlPosd]:–ma         EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Rel][1SgPoss][DuPosd]:%%%:(e)gma        EncliticOrEnd; ! 1Sg possessor |
-[N][Rel][1PlPoss][SgPosd]:–mta        EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Rel][1PlPoss][PlPosd]:–mta        EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Rel][1PlPoss][DuPosd]:%%%:(e)gemta      EncliticOrEnd; ! 1Pl possessor |
-[N][Rel][1DuPoss][SgPosd]:–megnuk     EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Rel][1DuPoss][PlPosd]:–megnuk     EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Rel][1DuPoss][DuPosd]:%%%:(e)gmegnuk    EncliticOrEnd; ! 1Du possessor |
-[N][Rel][1DuPoss][SgPosd]:–mnuk       EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Rel][1DuPoss][PlPosd]:–mnuk       EncliticOrEnd;
! -------------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------------------|-----------------|
-[N][Rel][2SgPoss][SgPosd]:+p|.vet     EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Rel][2SgPoss][PlPosd]:+p|.vet     EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Rel][2SgPoss][DuPosd]:%%%:(e)gpet       EncliticOrEnd; ! 2Sg possessor |
-[N][Rel][2SgPoss][SgPosd]:–vet        EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Rel][2SgPoss][PlPosd]:–vet        EncliticOrEnd; 
-[N][Rel][2PlPoss][SgPosd]:+p|.vci     EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Rel][2PlPoss][PlPosd]:+p|.vci     EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Rel][2PlPoss][DuPosd]:%%%:(e)gpeci      EncliticOrEnd; ! 2Pl possessor |
-[N][Rel][2PlPoss][SgPosd]:–vci        EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Rel][2PlPoss][PlPosd]:–vci        EncliticOrEnd; 
-[N][Rel][2DuPoss][SgPosd]:+p|.vtek    EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Rel][2DuPoss][PlPosd]:+p|.vtek    EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Rel][2DuPoss][DuPosd]:%%%:(e)gpetek     EncliticOrEnd; ! 2Du possessor |
-[N][Rel][2DuPoss][SgPosd]:–vtek       EncliticOrEnd; -[N][Rel][2DuPoss][PlPosd]:–vtek       EncliticOrEnd; 
! -------------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------------------|-----------------|

LEXICON Ignorative
nate[Ignorative]:nate                           NounInflection; ! what part?; some part; a certain part
